District of Columbia statutes.
47-301.01

Submission of annual expense estimates by court-appointed receivers.

If a department or agency of the government of the District of Columbia is under the administration of a court-appointed receiver or other court-appointed official during fiscal year 1998 or any succeeding fiscal year, the receiver or official shall prepare and submit to the Mayor, for inclusion in the annual budget of the District of Columbia for the year, annual estimates of the expenditures and appropriations necessary for the maintenance and operation of the department or agency. All such estimates shall be forwarded by the Mayor to the Council, for its action pursuant to sections 446 and 603(c) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, without revision but subject to the Mayor’s recommendations. Notwithstanding any provision of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, the Council may comment or make recommendations concerning such annual estimates but shall have no authority under such Act to revise such estimates.

Nov. 19, 1997, 111 Stat. 2178, Pub. L. 105-100, § 140
This section is referenced in § 7-1811.02.
1981 Ed., § 47-301.1.
Sections 446 and 603(c) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, referred to in this section, are §§ 446 and 603(c) of the Act of December 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 774, Pub. L. 93-198, set out in Volume 1, and codified as §§ 1-204.46 and 1-206.03(c), respectively.